Utah statutes.
62A-11-302.   Common-law and statutory remedies augmented by act -- Public
policy.
The state of Utah, exercising its police and sovereign power, declares that
the common-law and statutory remedies pertaining to family desertion and
nonsupport of minor dependent children shall be augmented by this part, which
is directed to the real and personal property resources of the responsible
parents.  In order to render resources more immediately available to meet the
needs of minor children, it is the legislative intent that the remedies
provided in this part are in addition to, and not in lieu of, existing law.
It is declared to be the public policy of this state that this part be
liberally construed and administered to the end that children shall be
maintained from the resources of responsible parents, thereby relieving or
avoiding, at least in part, the burden often borne by the general citizenry
through public assistance programs.
